Washington statutes.
RCW 42.16.012

State payroll revolving account—Disbursements—Sources.

The amounts to be disbursed from the state payroll revolving account from time to time on behalf of agencies utilizing such account shall be transferred thereto by the state treasurer from appropriated funds properly chargeable with the disbursement for the purposes set forth in RCW 42.16.011, on or before the day prior to scheduled disbursement.

[ 2012 c 198 s 21; 1981 c 9 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 25 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 198: See note following RCW 70A.15.5110.